test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pyisy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - пися: # Noun 'mouse' - full paradigm /Type 21/
     пися+N+Sg+Nom: пися
     пися+N+Sg+Acc: писямʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Gen: писяʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Dat: писянʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Loc: писяхана
     пися+N+Sg+Abl: писяхад
     пися+N+Sg+Pros: писявна
     пися+N+Du+Nom: писяхаʼ
     пися+N+Du+Acc: писяхаʼ
     пися+N+Du+Gen: писяхаʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Nom: писяˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Acc: пись
     пися+N+Pl+Gen: письˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Dat: писяхаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc: писяхаˮна
     пися+N+Pl+Abl: писяхат
     пися+N+Pl+Pros: письˮмана  
       
     пися+N+Tra: писяӈэ
     пися+N+Car: писясиˮ
     пися+N+Equ: писядаремʼ
     пися+N+Equ+Lat: писядаревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: писяв 
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: писяр  
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: писяда 
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: писямиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: писяриʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: писядиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: писяваˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: писяраˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: писядоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [писяв, писями]
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: писямд  
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: писямда 
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: писямиʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: писямдиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: писямдиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: писяваˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: писямдаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: писямдоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [писян, писяни] 
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: писянд  
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: писянда 
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: писяниʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: писяндиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: писяндиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: писянаˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: писяндаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: писяндоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [писяхан, писяхани]
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: писяханд  
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: писяханда 
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: писяханиʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: писяхандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: писяхандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: писяханаˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: писяхандаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: писяхандоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [писяханан, писяханани] 
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: писяхананд  
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: писяхананда 
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: писяхананиʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: писяханандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: писяханандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: писяхананаˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: писяханандаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: писяханандоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [писяхадан, писяхадани]  
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: писяхаданд  
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: писяхаданда 
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: писяхаданиʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: писяхадандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: писяхадандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: писяхаданаˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: писяхадандаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: писяхадандоʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [писявнан, писявнани]
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: писявнанд  
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: писявнанда 
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: писявнаниʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: писявнандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: писявнандиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: писявнанаˮ 
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: писявнандаˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: писявнандоʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: писяхаюн  
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: писяхаюд  
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: писяхаюда 
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: писяхаюниʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: писяхаюнаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: писяхаюдаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: писяхаюдоʼ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: писяхаюн  
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: писяхаюд  
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: писяхаюда 
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: писяхаюниʼ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: писяхаюнаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: писяхаюдаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: писяхаюдоʼ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: писяхаюн  
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: писяхают  
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: писяхаюта 
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: писяхаюниʼ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: писяхаютиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: писяхаютиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: писяхаюнаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: писяхаютаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: писяхаютоʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [письн, письни]   
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: письд   
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: письда  
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: письниʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: письнаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: письдаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: письдоʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [письн, письни]   
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: письд   
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: письда  
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: письниʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: письнаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: письдаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: письдоʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: письˮн  
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: письт   
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: письта  
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: письˮниʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: письтиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: письтиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: письˮнаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: письтаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: письтоʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: писяхаˮн 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: писяхат 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: писяхата 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: писяхаˮниʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: писяхатиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: писяхатиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: писяхаˮнаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: писяхатаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: писяхатоʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: писяхаˮнан  
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: писяхаˮнат  
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: писяхаˮната 
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: писяхаˮнаниʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: писяхаˮнатиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: писяхаˮнатиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: писяхаˮнанаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: писяхаˮнатаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: писяхаˮнатоʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: писяхатан 
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: писяхатат 
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: писяхатата 
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: писяхатаниʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: писяхататиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: писяхататиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: писяхатанаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: писяхататаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: писяхататоʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: письˮманан  
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: письˮманат  
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: письˮманата 
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: письˮмананиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: письˮманатиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: письˮманатиʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: письˮмананаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: письˮманатаˮ
     пися+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: письˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative

     пися+N+Pred+Abs: писяд
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: писядав 
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: писядар  
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: писядада 
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: писядав
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: писядамд
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: писядамда
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: писядан
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: писяданд
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: писяданда
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: писядамиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: писядариʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: писядадиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: писядамиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: писядамдиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: писядамдиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: писяданиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: писядандиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: писядандиʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: писядаваˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: писядараˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: писядадоʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: писядаваˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: писядамдаˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: писядамдоʼ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: писяданаˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: писядандаˮ
     пися+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: писядандоʼ

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: писядмʼ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: писян  
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: пися   
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: писяниʼ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: писядиʼ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: писяхаʼ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: писяваˮ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: писядаˮ
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: писяˮ  
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: писядамзь
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: писянась 
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: писясь   
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: писянинзь
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: писядинзь
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: писяханзь
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: писяваць 
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: писядаць 
     пися+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: писяць   

# Predicative Possessive forms 

     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяв 
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяр  
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяда 
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писямиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяриʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писядиʼ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяваˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писяраˮ
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: писядоʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюн  
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюд  
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюда 
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюниʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюдиʼ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюнаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюдаˮ
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: писяхаюдоʼ
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: писян   
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: писяд   
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письда  
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письниʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письдиʼ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письнаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письдаˮ 
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: письдоʼ 
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писявась
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писярась
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писядась
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писяминзь
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писяринзь
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писядинзь
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писяваць
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писяраць
     пися+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: писядонзь
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюнась
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдась
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдась
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюнинзь
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдинзь
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдинзь
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюнаць
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдаць
     пися+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: писяхаюдонзь
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письнась
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдась
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдась
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письнинзь
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдинзь
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдинзь
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письнаць
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдаць
     пися+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: письдонзь
